Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.402

Running start program—Funding levels—Report.

(1) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.4 full-time equivalents, including school district and institution of higher education enrollment.

(2) In calculating the combined full-time equivalents, the office of the superintendent of public instruction:

(a) Must adopt rules to fund the participating student's enrollment in running start courses provided by the institution of higher education during the summer academic term, up to a maximum of 10 college credits per student per summer academic term; and

(b) May average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and the institution of higher education.

(3) Running start programs as a service delivery model and associated funding levels beyond 1.0 full-time equivalent per student are not part of the state's statutory program of basic education under chapter 28A.150 RCW.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the participating institutions of higher education, the student achievement council, and the education data center, must annually track, and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature, the combined full-time equivalent experience of students participating in running start programs, including course load analyses and enrollments by high school and participating institutions of higher education.

[ 2023 c 350 s 1.]